apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="i__vbtr">
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>               <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ita</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itaj</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itan</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ataj</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atan</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ontaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ante</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l>                <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igi</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igas</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igis</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igos</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igus</l>             <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igita</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitaj</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitan</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igata</l>            <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igataj</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatan</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igonta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igontaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igante</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginte</l>           <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igu</l>              <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alcentrigi">                     <i>alcentrig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="alvoki">                         <i>alvok</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="antaŭrakonti">                   <i>antaŭrakont</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="atenti">                         <i>atent</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="blindigi">                       <i>blindig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉagreni">                        <i>ĉagren</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉirkaŭskribi">                   <i>ĉirkaŭskrib</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="delasi">                         <i>delas</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="devi">                           <i>dev</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="dismembrigi">                    <i>dismembrig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="doni">                           <i>don</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="ekkompreni">                     <i>ekkompren</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="elcentrigi">                     <i>elcentrig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="elpetigi">                       <i>elpetig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="elverŝi">                        <i>elverŝ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="enkapigi">                       <i>enkapig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="enskatoligi">                    <i>enskatolig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="fabriki">                        <i>fabrik</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="filiigi">                        <i>filiig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="fordirekti">                     <i>fordirekt</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="foruzi">                         <i>foruz</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="garbigi">                        <i>garbig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="gravuri">                        <i>gravur</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="honorigi">                       <i>honorig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="inokuli">                        <i>inokul</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="jesigi">                         <i>jesig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="klasi">                          <i>klas</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="kondamni">                       <i>kondamn</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="kontinuigi">                     <i>kontinuig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="kristaligi">                     <i>kristalig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="kuraĝigi">                       <i>kuraĝig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="lernigi">                        <i>lernig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="malami">                         <i>malam</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="malhardi">                       <i>malhard</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="malmendi">                       <i>malmend</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="maltigi">                        <i>maltig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="memorigi">                       <i>memorig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="mordi">                          <i>mord</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="nuanci">                         <i>nuanc</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="ostaĝigi">                       <i>ostaĝig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="pecigi">                         <i>pecig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="pinĉi">                          <i>pinĉ</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="pretigi">                        <i>pretig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="rajtigi">                        <i>rajtig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="relativigi">                     <i>relativig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="rimarki">                        <i>rimark</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="senglorigi">                     <i>senglorig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="sin dronigi">                    <i>sin<b/>dronig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="steriligi">                      <i>sterilig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="surfadenigi">                    <i>surfadenig</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="transformi">                     <i>transform</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
    <e lm="veneni">                         <i>venen</i><par n="i__vbtr"/></e>
